apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.ca.dix
<pardef n="m/ón__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ón</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



 <pardef n="abric__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="acc/és__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essos</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="ab/ús__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usos</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ús</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="acci/ó__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="accessibilitat__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="bo__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="m/à__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="bacall/à__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  <pardef n="alg/a__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="col·leg/a__n">

<e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
</e>

<e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
</e>

<e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
</e>

<e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
</e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="acústi/ca__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="adre/ça__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ça<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ça</l>
          <r>ça<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  <pardef n="as__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="Ebre__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fi__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="afores__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="escombraries__n">
      
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="abast__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 <pardef n="aig/ua__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ües</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="cos__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sos</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="desi/g__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjos</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gs</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="assa/ig__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="barre/ja__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="carism/a__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="or/igen__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ígens</l>
          <r>igen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igen</l>
          <r>igen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="pa/ís__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïsos</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ís</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="aigua"><i>aig</i><par n="aig/ua__n"/></e>
<e lm="desig"><i>desi</i><par n="desi/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="llengua"><i>lleng</i><par n="aig/ua__n"/></e>
<e lm="mà"><i>m</i><par n="m/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="món"><i>m</i><par n="m/ón__n"/></e>
<e lm="país"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="pas"><i>pas</i><par n="cos__n"/></e>
<e lm="procés"><i>proc</i><par n="acc/és__n"/></e>
<e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="bo__n"/></e>
<e lm="terra"><i>terr</i><par n="carism/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="tros"><i>tros</i><par n="cos__n"/></e>
<e lm="mig"><i>mi</i><par n="desi/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="abús"><i>ab</i><par n="ab/ús__n"/></e>
<e lm="adreça"><i>adre</i><par n="adre/ça__n"/></e>
<e lm="balanç"><i>balanç</i><par n="as__n"/></e>
<e lm="raça"><i>ra</i><par n="adre/ça__n"/></e>
<e lm="col·lega"><i>col·leg</i><par n="col·leg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="granja"><i>gran</i><par n="barre/ja__n"/></e>
<e lm="do"><i>do</i><par n="bo__n"/></e>
<e lm="mà d'obra"><i>m</i><par n="m/à__n"/><p><l><b/>d'obra</l><r><g><b/>d'obra</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lliga"><i>llig</i><par n="alg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="magatzem"><i>magatzem</i><par n="abric__n"/></e>
<e lm="matemàtiques"><i>matemàtiques</i><par n="escombraries__n"/></e>
<e lm="nas"><i>nas</i><par n="cos__n"/></e>
<e lm="oceà"><i>oce</i><par n="bacall/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="taronja"><i>taron</i><par n="barre/ja__n"/></e>
<e lm="pantalons"><i>pantalons</i><par n="afores__n"/></e>
<e lm="calçotets"><i>calçotets</i><par n="afores__n"/></e>
<e lm="to"><i>to</i><par n="bo__n"/></e>
<e lm="aiguavés"><i>aiguav</i><par n="acc/és__n"/></e>
<e lm="poema"><i>poem</i><par n="carism/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="inrevés"><i>inrev</i><par n="acc/és__n"/></e>
<e lm="tisores"><i>tisores</i><par n="escombraries__n"/></e>
<e lm="recerca"><i>recer</i><par n="acústi/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="tiroteig"><i>tirote</i><par n="assa/ig__n"/></e>
<e lm="traç"><i>traç</i><par n="as__n"/></e>
<e lm="automobilisme"><i>automobilisme</i><par n="Ebre__n"/></e>
<e lm="sismicitat"><i>sismicitat</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="fragmoplast"><i>fragmoplast</i><par n="abast__n"/></e>
<e lm="adjectivació"><i>adjectivaci</i><par n="acci/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="perspectivisme"><i>perspectivisme</i><par n="abric__n"/></e>
<e lm="rudesa"><i>rudesa</i><par n="fi__n"/></e>
<e lm="ortiga"><i>ortig</i><par n="alg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="micromón"><i>microm</i><par n="m/ón__n"/></e>
<e lm="isoantigen"><i>isoant</i><par n="or/igen__n"/></e>
<e lm="polinucleosi"><i>polinucleosi</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="huracà"><i>hurac</i><par n="bacall/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="fre"><i>fre</i><par n="bo__n"/></e>
<e lm="microinformàtica"><i>microinformàti</i><par n="acústi/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="borneig"><i>borne</i><par n="assa/ig__n"/></e>
<e lm="desoxidació"><i>desoxidaci</i><par n="acci/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="rectitud"><i>rectitud</i><par n="fi__n"/></e>
<e lm="pertinença"><i>pertinen</i><par n="adre/ça__n"/></e>
<e lm="mos"><i>mos</i><par n="Ebre__n"/></e>
<e lm="daltabaix"><i>daltabaix</i><par n="abast__n"/></e>
<e lm="obús"><i>ob</i><par n="ab/ús__n"/></e>
<e lm="talismà"><i>talism</i><par n="bacall/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="aràcnid"><i>aràcnid</i><par n="abric__n"/></e>
<e lm="abús"><i>ab</i><par n="ab/ús__n"/></e>
<e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="as__n"/></e>
<e lm="exocitosi"><i>exocitosi</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="locomoció"><i>locomoci</i><par n="acci/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="prismàtics"><i>prismàtics</i><par n="afores__n"/></e>
<e lm="paradigma"><i>paradigm</i><par n="carism/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="gnomònica"><i>gnomòni</i><par n="acústi/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="entrenús"><i>entren</i><par n="ab/ús__n"/></e>
<e lm="baldereig"><i>baldere</i><par n="assa/ig__n"/></e>
<e lm="netedat"><i>netedat</i><par n="fi__n"/></e>
<e lm="leucoplast"><i>leucoplast</i><par n="abast__n"/></e>
<e lm="empirisme"><i>empirisme</i><par n="abric__n"/></e>
<e lm="macromón"><i>macrom</i><par n="m/ón__n"/></e>
<e lm="cromització"><i>cromitzaci</i><par n="acci/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="metàtesi"><i>metàtesi</i><par n="accessibilitat__n"/></e>
<e lm="bàsquet"><i>bàsquet</i><par n="Ebre__n"/></e>
<e lm="natja"><i>nat</i><par n="barre/ja__n"/></e>
<e lm="excés"><i>exc</i><par n="acc/és__n"/></e>
<e lm="oxigen"><i>ox</i><par n="or/igen__n"/></e>
<e lm="vacances"><i>vacances</i><par n="escombraries__n"/></e>
<e lm="meridià"><i>meridi</i><par n="bacall/à__n"/></e>
<e lm="antigen"><i>ant</i><par n="or/igen__n"/></e>
<e lm="contrafuga"><i>contrafug</i><par n="alg/a__n"/></e>
